Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-423
Costs; transporting prisoners; returning fugitives from justice; counties to pay.

Each county shall pay the costs of transporting convicted prisoners to any Department of Correctional Services adult facility and the cost of returning fugitives from justice.

Laws 1915, c. 138, § 1, p. 304;

C.S.1922, § 7000a;

C.S.1929, § 83-938;

R.S.1943, § 83-423;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 35.